District of Columbia statutes.
44-1506

Disposition of fines.

One half of all the fines collected through the instrumentality of the Society or its agents, for violations of such laws shall accrue to the benefit of said Society.

History

June 21, 1870, 16 Stat. 158, ch. 135, § 6
Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1198, ch. 854, § 48

Cross References

Animal cruelty, fines and penalties, disposition, see § 22-1006.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-906.
1973 Ed., § 32-206.